test/src/morphology/V-kosima87_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kosima: # Verb (87) kosima 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kosima+V+Inf/mA: kosima
     kosima+V+Inf: kossiq
     kosima+V+ActPrtPrc: kosinuq
     kosima+V+PssPrtPrc: kosit
     kosima+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: kosi
     kosima+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: kosi
     kosima+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: kosõ
     kosima+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: kosõ
